Utah statutes.
63G-7-101.   Title, scope, and intent.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Governmental Immunity Act of Utah."

(2) (a)  The waivers and retentions of immunity found in this chapter apply to all functions of government, no matter how labeled.

(b)  This single, comprehensive chapter governs all claims against governmental entities or against their employees or agents arising out of the performance of the employee's duties, within the scope of employment, or under color of authority.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

